Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.96.030

Undocumented student support loan match account.

(1) The undocumented student support loan match account is created in the custody of the state treasurer as a nonappropriated account to be used solely and exclusively for the program created in RCW 28B.96.020. The purpose of the account is to provide state matching funds for the undocumented student support loan program.

(2) Revenues to the account consist of appropriations by the legislature into the account.

(3)(a) The legislature must appropriate a state match, up to a maximum of two million dollars per fiscal biennium, beginning January 1, 2022, and each January 1st following the end of the fiscal year based on donations and pledges received by the office for the program as of the date each official state caseload forecast is submitted by the caseload forecast council to the legislative fiscal committees, as provided under RCW 43.88C.020. Nothing in this subsection expands or modifies the responsibilities of the caseload forecast council.

(b) In any year that the fund balance of the account is ten million dollars or more on the last day of the fiscal year, no state match shall be required the following year.

(4) Expenditures, in the form of matching funds, from the account may be made only upon receipt of proof from the office of private contributions to the program. Expenditures, in the form of matching funds, may not exceed the total amount of private contributions.

(5) Only the executive director of the office or the executive director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. Such authorization must be made as soon as practicable following receipt of proof as required under subsection (4) of this section.

[ 2020 c 326 s 4.]